local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="arer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ro__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ioù</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kont/ell__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>illi</l>
          <r>ell<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/estr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estr</l>
          <r>estr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>istri</l>
          <r>estr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/askorn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>askorn</l>
          <r>askorn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eskern</l>
          <r>askorn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ezel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezel</l>
          <r>ezel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>izili</l>
          <r>ezel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/morzhed__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>morzhed</l>
          <r>morzhed<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>divorzhed</l>
          <r>morzhed<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bug/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ale</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/arc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arc’h</l>
          <r>arc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irc’hier</l>
          <r>arc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/ac’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac’h</l>
          <r>ac’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>ac’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="itron__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="deli/enn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enn</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ibil__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/oc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oc’h</l>
          <r>oc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>oc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwal/enn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enn</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inier</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="y/alc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alc’h</l>
          <r>alc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilc’hier</l>
          <r>alc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tr/oad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oad</l>
          <r>oad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eid</l>
          <r>oad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/orn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orn</l>
          <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erniel</l>
          <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ti__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/orc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orc’h</l>
          <r>orc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erc’hier</l>
          <r>orc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="buoc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enned</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ael__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ael</l>
          <r>ael<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>ael<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwr/eg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agez</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kr/aou__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aou</l>
          <r>aou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evier</l>
          <r>aou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bot/ez__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>ez<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>ez<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/arar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arar</l>
          <r>arar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erer</l>
          <r>arar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="si__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/arv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arv</l>
          <r>arv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irvi</l>
          <r>arv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ael"><i/><par n="/ael__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arar"><i/><par n="/arar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arc’h"><i/><par n="/arc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="askorn"><i/><par n="/askorn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bleunienn"><par n="initial-b"/><i>leuni</i><par n="deli/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="botez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ot</i><par n="bot/ez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bugel"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ug</i><par n="bug/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buoc’h"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uoc’h</i><par n="buoc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delienn"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eli</i><par n="deli/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ebeul"><i>ebeul</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enebour"><i>enebour</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ezel"><i/><par n="/ezel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forc’h"><i>f</i><par n="f/orc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwalenn"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>al</i><par n="gwal/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwreg"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>r</i><par n="gwr/eg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwrizienn"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>rizi</i><par n="deli/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ibil"><i>ibil</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intañv"><i>intañv</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keginer"><i>keginer</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelenner"><i>kelenner</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiger"><i>kiger</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontell"><i>kont</i><par n="kont/ell__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korn"><i>k</i><par n="k/orn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraou"><i>kr</i><par n="kr/aou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavar"><i>lavar</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lestr"><i>l</i><par n="m/estr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mantell"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ant</i><par n="kont/ell__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mestr"><par n="initial-m"/><i/><par n="m/estr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="micherour"><par n="initial-m"/><i>icherour</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morzhed"><i/><par n="/morzhed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pesketaer"><par n="initial-p"/><i>esketaer</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roc’h"><i>r</i><par n="r/oc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sac’h"><i>s</i><par n="s/ac’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="servijer"><i>servijer</i><par n="ibil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarv"><par n="initial-t"/><i/><par n="t/arv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="touell"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ouell</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>r</i><par n="tr/oad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yalc’h"><i>y</i><par n="y/alc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adaozadur"><i>adaozadur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arseller"><i>arseller</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="azeuldi"><i>azeuldi</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bevezadur"><par n="initial-b"/><i>evezadur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boser"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oser</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chastre"><i>chastre</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dibourc’herezh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ibourc’herezh</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diviz"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iviz</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eilrener"><i>eilrener</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emplegadur"><i>emplegadur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etrewered"><i>etrewered</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="floderezh"><i>floderezh</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwerzher"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>erzher</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heñchadur"><i>heñchadur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hurlink"><i>hurlink</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelenner"><par n="initial-k"/><i>elenner</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kenluzierezh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>enluzierezh</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krouger"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rouger</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lambig"><i>lambig</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lennadur"><i>lennadur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="micherour"><par n="initial-m"/><i>icherour</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patrom"><par n="initial-p"/><i>atrom</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pav"><par n="initial-p"/><i>av</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poster"><par n="initial-p"/><i>oster</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="selladur"><i>selladur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skulter"><i>skulter</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spi"><i>spi</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yalc’hadour"><i>yalc’hadour</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
